California, session 20252026, SB1444.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21472 of the Government Code is amended to read:21472. (a) An election, revocation, or change of election shall be made within 60 calendar days after the making of the first payment on account of any retirement allowance or, in the event of a change of retirement status after retirement, within 60 calendar days after the making of the first payment on account of any retirement allowance following the change in retirement status. “Change in retirement status” includes, but is not limited to, change from service to disability retirement, from disability retirement to service retirement, from nonindustrial disability retirement to industrial disability retirement, or from industrial to nonindustrial disability retirement.(b) For purposes of this section, payment shall be deemed to have been made on the date a warrant is mailed, or the date funds are electronically transferred to a bank, savings and loan association, or credit union account for deposit in the member’s account.(c) This section shall not be construed to authorize a member to change their retirement status after the election, revocation, or change of election provided in this section.(d) This section shall apply to any member who retires on or after January 1, 2018.SEC. 2. Section 98 of the Labor Code is amended to read:98. (a) The Labor Commissioner is authorized to investigate employee complaints. The Labor Commissioner may provide for a hearing in any action to recover wages, penalties, and other demands for compensation, including liquidated damages if the complaint alleges payment of a wage less than the minimum wage fixed by an order of the Industrial Welfare Commission or by statute, properly before the division or the Labor Commissioner, including orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission, and shall determine all matters arising under their jurisdiction. The Labor Commissioner may also provide for a hearing to recover civil penalties due pursuant to Section 558 against any employer or other person acting on behalf of an employer, including, but not limited to, an individual liable pursuant to Section 558.1. It is within the jurisdiction of the Labor Commissioner to accept and determine claims from holders of payroll checks or payroll drafts returned unpaid because of insufficient funds, if, after a diligent search, the holder is unable to return the dishonored check or draft to the payee and recover the sums paid out. Within 30 days of the filing of the complaint, the Labor Commissioner shall notify the parties as to whether a hearing will be held, whether action will be taken in accordance with Section 98.3, or whether no further action will be taken on the complaint. If the determination is made by the Labor Commissioner to hold a hearing, the hearing shall be held within 90 days of the date of that determination. However, the Labor Commissioner may postpone or grant additional time before setting a hearing if the Labor Commissioner finds that it would lead to an equitable and just resolution of the dispute. A party who has received actual notice of a claim before the Labor Commissioner shall, while the matter is before the Labor Commissioner, notify the Labor Commissioner in writing of any change in that party’s business, business address, personal address, or electronic address within 10 days after the change in address occurs.It is the intent of the Legislature that hearings held pursuant to this section be conducted in an informal setting preserving the rights of the parties.(b) When a hearing is set, a copy of the complaint, which shall include the amount of compensation requested, together with a notice of time and place of the hearing, shall be served on all parties.(c) Within 10 days after service of the notice and the complaint, a defendant may file an answer with the Labor Commissioner in any form as the Labor Commissioner may prescribe, setting forth the particulars in which the complaint is inaccurate or incomplete and the facts upon which the defendant intends to rely.(d) No pleading other than the complaint and answer of the defendant or defendants shall be required. Both shall be in writing and shall conform to the form and the rules of practice and procedure adopted by the Labor Commissioner.(e) Evidence on matters not pleaded in the answer shall be allowed only on terms and conditions the Labor Commissioner shall impose. In all these cases, the claimant shall be entitled to a continuance for purposes of review of the new evidence.(f) If the defendant fails to appear or answer within the time allowed under this chapter, no default shall be taken against them, but the Labor Commissioner shall hear the evidence offered and shall issue an order, decision, or award in accordance with the evidence. A defendant failing to appear or answer, or subsequently contending to be aggrieved in any manner by want of notice of the pendency of the proceedings, may apply to the Labor Commissioner for relief in accordance with Section 473 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The Labor Commissioner may afford this relief. No right to relief, including the claim that the findings or award of the Labor Commissioner or judgment entered thereon are void upon their face, shall accrue to the defendant in any court unless prior application is made to the Labor Commissioner in accordance with this chapter.(g) All hearings conducted pursuant to this chapter are governed by the division and by the rules of practice and procedure adopted by the Labor Commissioner.(h) (1) Whenever a claim is filed under this chapter against a person operating or doing business under a fictitious business name, as defined in Section 17900 of the Business and Professions Code, which relates to the person’s business, the division shall inquire at the time of the hearing whether the name of the person is the legal name under which the business or person has been licensed, registered, incorporated, or otherwise authorized to do business.(2) The division may amend an order, decision, or award to conform to the legal name of the business or the person who is the defendant to a wage claim, if it can be shown that proper service was made on the defendant or their agent, unless a judgment had been entered on the order, decision, or award pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 98.2. The Labor Commissioner may apply to the clerk of the superior court to amend a judgment that has been issued pursuant to a final order, decision, or award to conform to the legal name of the defendant, if it can be shown that proper service was made on the defendant or their agent.(i) (A) A notice required to be given pursuant to this section shall be given by personal service, first-class mail, certified mail, registered mail, in the manner specified in Section 415.20 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or by any manner that the party agrees to accept service, including, but not limited to, electronic service.(B) A party that is represented by an attorney shall provide the Labor Commissioner with the attorney’s electronic mail address and shall accept electronic service from the Labor Commissioner.SEC. 3. Section 98.1 of the Labor Code is amended to read:98.1. (a) (1) Within 15 days after the hearing is concluded, the Labor Commissioner shall file in the office of the division a copy of the order, decision, or award. The order, decision, or award shall include a summary of the hearing and the reasons for the decision. Upon filing of the order, decision, or award, the Labor Commissioner shall serve a copy of the decision personally, by first-class mail, or in the manner specified in Section 415.20 of the Code of Civil Procedure on the parties. in compliance with paragraph (2). The notice shall also advise the parties of their right to appeal the decision or award and further advise the parties that failure to do so within the period prescribed by this chapter shall result in the decision or award becoming final and enforceable as a judgment by the superior court.(2) (A) The Labor Commissioner shall serve the notice required by this subdivision by personal service, first-class mail, certified mail, registered mail, in the manner specified in Section 415.20 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or by any manner that the party agrees to accept service, including, but not limited to, electronic service.(B) A party that is represented by an attorney shall provide the Labor Commissioner with the attorney’s electronic mail address and shall accept electronic service from the Labor Commissioner.(b) For the purpose of this section, an award shall include any sums found owing, damages proved, and any penalties awarded pursuant to this code.(c) All awards granted pursuant to a hearing under this chapter shall accrue interest on all due and unpaid wages at the same rate as prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code. The interest shall accrue until the wages are paid from the date that the wages were due and payable as provided in Part 1 (commencing with Section 200) of Division 2.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 226.8 of the Labor Code is amended to read:226.8. (a) It is unlawful for any person or employer to engage in any of the following activities:(1) Willful misclassification of an individual as an independent contractor.(2) Charging an individual who has been willfully misclassified as an independent contractor a fee, or making any deductions from compensation, for any purpose, including for goods, materials, space rental, services, government licenses, repairs, equipment maintenance, or fines arising from the individual’s employment where any of the acts described in this paragraph would have violated the law if the individual had not been misclassified.(b) If the Labor and Workforce Development Agency or a court issues a determination that a person or employer has engaged in any of the enumerated violations of subdivision (a), the person or employer shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each violation, in addition to any other penalties or fines permitted by law.(c) If the Labor and Workforce Development Agency or a court issues a determination that a person or employer has engaged in any of the enumerated violations of subdivision (a) and the person or employer has engaged in or is engaging in a pattern or practice of these violations, the person or employer shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation, in addition to any other penalties or fines permitted by law.(d) (1) If the Labor and Workforce Development Agency or a court issues a determination that a person or employer that is a licensed contractor pursuant to the Contractors State License Law has violated subdivision (a), the agency, in addition to any other remedy that has been ordered, shall transmit a certified copy of the order to the Contractors State License Board.(2) The registrar of the Contractors State License Board shall initiate disciplinary action against a licensee within 30 days of receiving a certified copy of an agency or court order that resulted in disbarment pursuant to paragraph (1).(e) If the Labor and Workforce Development Agency or a court issues a determination that a person or employer has violated subdivision (a), the agency or court, in addition to any other remedy that has been ordered, shall order the person or employer to display prominently on its internet website, in an area which is accessible to all employees and the general public, or, if the person or employer does not have an internet website, to display prominently in an area that is accessible to all employees and the general public at each location where a violation of subdivision (a) occurred, a notice that sets forth all of the following:(1) That the Labor and Workforce Development Agency or a court, as applicable, has found that the person or employer has committed a serious violation of the law by engaging in the willful misclassification of employees.(2) That the person or employer has changed its business practices in order to avoid committing further violations of this section.(3) That any employee who believes that they are being misclassified as an independent contractor may contact the Labor and Workforce Development Agency. The notice shall include the mailing address, email address, and telephone number of the agency.(4) That the notice is being posted pursuant to a state order.(f) In addition to including the information specified in subdivision (e), a person or employer also shall satisfy the following requirements in preparing the notice:(1) An officer shall sign the notice.(2) It shall post the notice for one year commencing with the date of the final decision and order.(g) (1) In accordance with the procedures set forth in Sections 98, 98.1, 98.2, 98.3, 98.7, 98.74, or 1197.1, the Labor Commissioner may enforce this section and issue a determination that a person or employer has violated subdivision (a). This enforcement of this section may include investigating an alleged violation of subdivision (a), ordering appropriate temporary relief to mitigate the violation or to maintain the status quo pending the completion of an investigation or hearing, issuance of a citation against an employer who violates subdivision (a), and filing a civil action. If a citation is issued, the procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations and civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner shall be the same as those set out in Section 98.74 or 1197.1, as appropriate. A public prosecutor, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 181, may also enforce this section by seeking the damages described in paragraph (2).(2) In any enforcement pursuant to this subdivision, each employee under Sections 98 to 98.2, inclusive, the Labor Commissioner under Section 98.3, 98.7, 98.74, or 1197.1, or a public prosecutor, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 181, may alternatively recover the penalties set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c) as damages payable to the employee. An employee is entitled to either recover the damages as provided for in this section or to enforce a civil penalty, as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 2699, but not both, for the same violation. Except as specified in this section, the remedy provided by this section is cumulative and does not limit the availability of any other remedy available to the employee.(h) Any administrative or civil penalty, damages, or disciplinary action pursuant to this section shall remain in effect against any successor corporation, owner, or business entity that satisfies both of the following:(1) Has one or more of the same principals or officers as the person or employer subject to the penalty or action.(2) Is engaged in the same or a similar business as the person or employer subject to the penalty or action.(i) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Determination” means an order, decision, award, or citation issued by an agency or a court of competent jurisdiction for which the time to appeal has expired and for which no appeal is pending.(2) “Labor and Workforce Development Agency” means the Labor and Workforce Development Agency or any of its departments, divisions, commissions, boards, or agencies.(3) “Officer” means the chief executive officer, president, any vice president in charge of a principal business unit, division, or function, or any other officer of the corporation who performs a policymaking function. If the employer is a partnership, “officer” means a partner. If the employer is a sole proprietor, “officer” means the owner.(4) “Willful misclassification” means avoiding employee status for an individual by voluntarily and knowingly misclassifying that individual as an independent contractor.(j) Nothing in this section is intended to limit any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.SEC. 4.SEC. 5. Section 3212 of the Labor Code is amended to read:3212. (a) (1) In the case of members of a sheriff’s office or the California Highway Patrol, district attorney’s staff of inspectors and investigators or of police or fire departments of cities, counties, cities and counties, districts or other public or municipal corporations or political subdivisions, whether those members are volunteer, partly paid, or fully paid, and in the case of active firefighting members of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection whose duties require firefighting or of any county forestry or firefighting department or unit, whether voluntary, fully paid, or partly paid, and in the case of members of the warden service of the Wildlife Protection Branch of the Department of Fish and Wildlife whose principal duties consist of active law enforcement service, excepting those whose principal duties are clerical or otherwise do not clearly fall within the scope of active law enforcement service such as stenographers, telephone operators, and other officeworkers, the term “injury” as used in this act includes hernia when any part of the hernia develops or manifests itself during a period while the member is in the service in the office, staff, division, department, or unit, and in the case of members of fire departments, except those whose principal duties are clerical, such as stenographers, telephone operators, and other officeworkers, and in the case of county forestry or firefighting departments, except those whose principal duties are clerical, such as stenographers, telephone operators, and other officeworkers, and in the case of active firefighting members of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection whose duties require firefighting, and in the case of members of the warden service of the Wildlife Protection Branch of the Department of Fish and Wildlife whose principal duties consist of active law enforcement service, excepting those whose principal duties are clerical or otherwise do not clearly fall within the scope of active law enforcement service such as stenographers, telephone operators, and other officeworkers, the term “injury” includes pneumonia and heart trouble that develops or manifests itself during a period while the member is in the service of the office, staff, department, or unit. In the case of regular salaried county or city and county peace officers, the term “injury” also includes any hernia that manifests itself or develops during a period while the officer is in the service. The compensation that is awarded for the hernia, heart trouble, or pneumonia shall include full hospital, surgical, medical treatment, disability indemnity, and death benefits, as provided by the workers’ compensation laws of this state.(2) The hernia, heart trouble, or pneumonia so developing or manifesting itself in those cases shall be presumed to arise out of and in the course of the employment. This presumption is disputable and may be controverted by other evidence, but unless so controverted, the appeals board is bound to find in accordance with it. The presumption shall be extended to a member following termination of service for a period of three calendar months for each full year of the requisite service, but not to exceed 60 months in any circumstance, commencing with the last date actually worked in the specified capacity.(3) The hernia, heart trouble, or pneumonia so developing or manifesting itself in those cases shall in no case be attributed to any disease existing prior to that development or manifestation.(b) This section also applies to all of the following, for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2026:(1) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a United States Department of Defense installation and who are certified by the United States Department of Defense as meeting its standards for firefighters.(2) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a National Aeronautics and Space Administration installation and who adhere to training standards established in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 13155) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) Active firefighting members of a fire department that provides fire protection to a commercial airport regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) under Part 139 (commencing with Section 139.1) of Subchapter G of Chapter I of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations and are trained in accordance with the standards of Section 139.319 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations.SEC. 5.SEC. 6. Section 3212.1 of the Labor Code is amended to read:3212.1. (a) This section applies to all of the following:(1) Active firefighting members, whether volunteers, partly paid, or fully paid, of all of the following fire departments:(A) A fire department of a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision.(B) A fire department of the University of California and the California State University.(C) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.(D) A county forestry or firefighting department or unit.(2) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a United States Department of Defense installation and who are certified by the Department of Defense as meeting its standards for firefighters.(3) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a National Aeronautics and Space Administration installation and who adhere to training standards established in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 13155) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.(4) Active firefighting members of a fire department that provides fire protection to a commercial airport regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) under Part 139 (commencing with Section 139.1) of Subchapter G of Chapter I of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations and are trained in accordance with the standards of Section 139.319 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2026.(5) Peace officers, as defined in Section 830.1, subdivision (a) of Section 830.2, and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.37, of the Penal Code, who are primarily engaged in active law enforcement activities.(6) (A) Fire and rescue services coordinators who work for the Office of Emergency Services.(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “fire and rescue services coordinators” means coordinators with any of the following job classifications: coordinator, senior coordinator, or chief coordinator.(b) The term “injury,” as used in this division, includes cancer, including leukemia, that develops or manifests itself during a period in which any member described in subdivision (a) is in the service of the department or unit, if the member demonstrates that they were exposed, while in the service of the department or unit, to a known carcinogen as defined by the International Agency for Research on Cancer, or as defined by the director.(c) The compensation that is awarded for cancer shall include full hospital, surgical, medical treatment, disability indemnity, and death benefits, as provided by this division.(d) The cancer so developing or manifesting itself in these cases shall be presumed to arise out of and in the course of the employment. This presumption is disputable and may be controverted by evidence that the primary site of the cancer has been established and that the carcinogen to which the member has demonstrated exposure is not reasonably linked to the disabling cancer. Unless so controverted, the appeals board is bound to find in accordance with the presumption. This presumption shall be extended to a member following termination of service for a period of three calendar months for each full year of the requisite service, but not to exceed 120 months in any circumstance, commencing with the last date actually worked in the specified capacity.(e) The amendments to this section enacted during the 1999 portion of the 1999–2000 Regular Session shall be applied to claims for benefits filed or pending on or after January 1, 1997, including, but not limited to, claims for benefits filed on or after that date that have previously been denied, or that are being appealed following denial.(f) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the William Dallas Jones Cancer Presumption Act of 2010.SEC. 6.SEC. 7. Section 3212.15 of the Labor Code is amended to read:3212.15. (a) This section applies to all of the following:(1) Active firefighting members, whether volunteers, partly paid, or fully paid, of all of the following fire departments:(A) A fire department of a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision.(B) A fire department of the University of California and the California State University.(C) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.(D) A county forestry or firefighting department or unit.(2) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a United States Department of Defense installation and who are certified by the Department of Defense as meeting its standards for firefighters.(3) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a National Aeronautics and Space Administration installation and who adhere to training standards established in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 13155) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.(4) Active firefighting members of a fire department that provides fire protection to a commercial airport regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) under Part 139 (commencing with Section 139.1) of Subchapter G of Chapter I of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations and are trained in accordance with the standards of Section 139.319 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2026.(5) Peace officers, as defined in Section 830.1 of, subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 830.2 of, Section 830.32 of, subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.37 of, Section 830.5 of, and Section 830.55 of, the Penal Code, who are primarily engaged in active law enforcement activities.(6) (A) Fire and rescue services coordinators who work for the Office of Emergency Services.(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “fire and rescue services coordinators” means coordinators with any of the following job classifications: coordinator, senior coordinator, or chief coordinator.(b) In the case of a person described in subdivision (a), the term “injury,” as used in this division, includes “post-traumatic stress disorder,” as diagnosed according to the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association and that develops or manifests itself during a period in which any person described in subdivision (a) is in the service of the department, unit, office, or agency.(c) For an injury that is diagnosed as specified in subdivision (b):(1) The compensation that is awarded shall include full hospital, surgical, medical treatment, disability indemnity, and death benefits, as provided by this division.(2) The injury so developing or manifesting itself in these cases shall be presumed to arise out of and in the course of the employment. This presumption is disputable and may be controverted by other evidence, but unless so controverted, the appeals board is bound to find in accordance with the presumption. This presumption shall be extended to a person described in subdivision (a) following termination of service for a period of 3 calendar months for each full year of the requisite service, but not to exceed 60 months in any circumstance, commencing with the last date actually worked in the specified capacity.(d) Compensation shall not be paid pursuant to this section for a claim of injury unless the person has performed services for the department, unit, office, or agency for at least six months. The six months of employment need not be continuous. This subdivision does not apply if the injury is caused by a sudden and extraordinary employment condition.(e) This section, as added by Section 2 of Chapter 390 of the Statutes of 2019, applies to injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2020.(f) (1) The Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation shall submit a report to the Legislature analyzing the effectiveness of the presumption created by this section. The report shall review data from post-traumatic stress disorder injuries for which compensation is claimed under this section from January 1, 2020, through December 31, 2025. The report shall be provided to the Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement and the Assembly Committee on Insurance no later than January 1, 2027.(2) The Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation shall submit a report to the Legislature analyzing claims filed for post-traumatic stress disorder injury for which compensation is claimed by public safety dispatchers, public safety telecommunicators, and emergency response communication employees, from January 1, 2020, through December 31, 2023. The study shall review data, including, but not limited to, the total number of claims, frequency of claim acceptance, frequency of claim denial, the initial claim determination, and the average time between the filing of a claim and the final determination of compensability. The report shall be provided to the Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement and the Assembly Committee on Insurance no later than January 1, 2025. For purposes of this subdivision, a “public safety dispatcher,” “public safety telecommunicator,” or “emergency response communication employee” means an individual employed by a public safety agency whose primary responsibility is to receive, process, transmit, or dispatch emergency and nonemergency calls for law enforcement, fire, emergency medical, and other public safety services by telephone, radio, or other communication device, and includes an individual who supervises other individuals who perform these functions.(3) A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 7.SEC. 8. Section 3212.6 of the Labor Code is amended to read:3212.6. (a) (1) In the case of a member of a police department of a city or county, or a member of the sheriff’s office of a county, or a member of the California Highway Patrol, or an inspector or investigator in a district attorney’s office of any county whose principal duties consist of active law enforcement service, or a prison or jail guard or correctional officer who is employed by a public agency, when that person is employed upon a regular, full-time salary, or in the case of members of fire departments of any city, county, or district, or other public or municipal corporations or political subdivisions, when those members are employed on a regular fully paid basis, and in the case of active firefighting members of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection whose duties require firefighting and first-aid response services, or of any county forestry or firefighting department or unit, where those members are employed on a regular fully paid basis, excepting those whose principal duties are clerical or otherwise do not clearly fall within the scope of active law enforcement, firefighting, or emergency first-aid response service such as stenographers, telephone operators, and other officeworkers, the term “injury” includes tuberculosis that develops or manifests itself during a period while that member is in the service of that department or office. The compensation that is awarded for the tuberculosis shall include full hospital, surgical, medical treatment, disability indemnity, and death benefits as provided by the provisions of this division.(2) The tuberculosis so developing or manifesting itself shall be presumed to arise out of and in the course of the employment. This presumption is disputable and may be controverted by other evidence, but unless so controverted, the appeals board is bound to find in accordance with it. This presumption shall be extended to a member following termination of service for a period of three calendar months for each full year of the requisite service, but not to exceed 60 months in any circumstance, commencing with the last date actually worked in the specified capacity.(3) A public entity may require applicants for employment in firefighting positions who would be entitled to the benefits granted by this section to be tested for infection for tuberculosis.(b) This section also applies to all of the following, for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2026:(1) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a United States Department of Defense installation and who are certified by the United States Department of Defense as meeting its standards for firefighters.(2) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a National Aeronautics and Space Administration installation and who adhere to training standards established in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 13155) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) Active firefighting members of a fire department that provides fire protection to a commercial airport regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) under Part 139 (commencing with Section 139.1) of Subchapter G of Chapter I of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations and are trained in accordance with the standards of Section 139.319 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations.SEC. 8.SEC. 9. Section 3212.8 of the Labor Code is amended to read:3212.8. (a) In the case of members of a sheriff’s office, of police or fire departments of cities, counties, cities and counties, districts, or other public or municipal corporations or political subdivisions, or individuals described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, whether those persons are volunteer, partly paid, or fully paid, and in the case of active firefighting members of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, or of any county forestry or firefighting department or unit, whether voluntary, fully paid, or partly paid, excepting those whose principal duties are clerical or otherwise do not clearly fall within the scope of active law enforcement service or active firefighting services, such as stenographers, telephone operators, and other officeworkers, the term “injury” as used in this division, includes a blood-borne infectious disease or methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus skin infection when any part of the blood-borne infectious disease or methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus skin infection develops or manifests itself during a period while that person is in the service of that office, staff, division, department, or unit. The compensation that is awarded for a blood-borne infectious disease or methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus skin infection shall include, but not be limited to, full hospital, surgical, medical treatment, disability indemnity, and death benefits, as provided by the workers’ compensation laws of this state.(b) (1) The blood-borne infectious disease or methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus skin infection so developing or manifesting itself in those cases shall be presumed to arise out of and in the course of the employment or service. This presumption is disputable and may be controverted by other evidence, but unless so controverted, the appeals board is bound to find in accordance with it.(2) The blood-borne infectious disease presumption shall be extended to a person covered by subdivision (a) following termination of service for a period of three calendar months for each full year of service, but not to exceed 60 months in any circumstance, commencing with the last date actually worked in the specified capacity.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus skin infection presumption shall be extended to a person covered by subdivision (a) following termination of service for a period of 90 days, commencing with the last day actually worked in the specified capacity.(c) The blood-borne infectious disease or methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus skin infection so developing or manifesting itself in those cases shall in no case be attributed to any disease or skin infection existing prior to that development or manifestation.(d) For the purposes of this section, “blood-borne infectious disease” means a disease caused by exposure to pathogenic microorganisms that are present in human blood that can cause disease in humans, including those pathogenic microorganisms defined as blood-borne pathogens by the Department of Industrial Relations.(e) This section also applies to all of the following, for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2026:(1) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a United States Department of Defense installation and who are certified by the United States Department of Defense as meeting its standards for firefighters.(2) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a National Aeronautics and Space Administration installation and who adhere to training standards established in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 13155) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) Active firefighting members of a fire department that provides fire protection to a commercial airport regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) under Part 139 (commencing with Section 139.1) of Subchapter G of Chapter I of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations and are trained in accordance with the standards of Section 139.319 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations.SEC. 9.SEC. 10. Section 3212.85 of the Labor Code is amended to read:3212.85. (a) This section applies to peace officers described in Sections 830.1 to 830.5, inclusive, of the Penal Code, and members of a fire department.(b) The term “injury,” as used in this division, includes illness or resulting death due to exposure to a biochemical substance that develops or occurs during a period in which any member described in subdivision (a) is in the service of the department or unit.(c) The compensation that is awarded for injury pursuant to this section shall include full hospital, surgical, medical treatment, disability indemnity, and death benefits, as provided by this division.(d) The injury that develops or manifests itself in these cases shall be presumed to arise out of, and in the course of, the employment. This presumption is disputable and may be controverted by other evidence. Unless controverted, the appeals board is bound to find in accordance with the presumption. This presumption shall be extended to a member following termination of service for a period of three calendar months for each full year of the requisite service, but not to exceed 60 months in any circumstance, commencing with the last date actually worked in the specified capacity.(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Biochemical substance” means any biological or chemical agent that may be used as a weapon of mass destruction, including, but not limited to, any chemical warfare agent, weaponized biological agent, or nuclear or radiological agent, as these terms are defined in Section 11417 of the Penal Code.(2) “Members of a fire department” includes, but is not limited to, an apprentice, volunteer, partly paid, or fully paid member of any of the following:(A) A fire department of a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision.(B) A fire department of the University of California and the California State University.(C) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.(D) A county forestry or firefighting department or unit.(E) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a United States Department of Defense installation and who are certified by the United States Department of Defense as meeting its standards for firefighters for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2026.(F) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a National Aeronautics and Space Administration installation and who adhere to training standards established in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 13155) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2026.(G) Active firefighting members of a fire department that provides fire protection to a commercial airport regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) under Part 139 (commencing with Section 139.1) of Subchapter G of Chapter I of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations and are trained in accordance with the standards of Section 139.319 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2026.SEC. 10.SEC. 11. Section 3212.9 of the Labor Code is amended to read:3212.9. (a) (1) In the case of a member of a police department of a city, county, or city and county, or a member of the sheriff’s office of a county, or a member of the California Highway Patrol, or a county probation officer, or an inspector or investigator in a district attorney’s office of any county whose principal duties consist of active law enforcement service, when that person is employed on a regular, full-time salary, or in the case of a member of a fire department of any city, county, or district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision, or any county forestry or firefighting department or unit, when those members are employed on a regular full-time salary, excepting those whose principal duties are clerical or otherwise do not clearly fall within the scope of active law enforcement or firefighting, such as stenographers, telephone operators, and other officeworkers, the term “injury” includes meningitis that develops or manifests itself during a period while that person is in the service of that department, office, or unit. The compensation that is awarded for the meningitis shall include full hospital, surgical, medical treatment, disability indemnity, and death benefits as provided by the provisions of this division.(2) The meningitis so developing or manifesting itself shall be presumed to arise out of and in the course of the employment. This presumption is disputable and may be controverted by other evidence, but unless so controverted, the appeals board is bound to find in accordance with it. This presumption shall be extended to a person following termination of service for a period of three calendar months for each full year of the requisite service, but not to exceed 60 months in any circumstance, commencing with the last date actually worked in the specified capacity.(b) This section also applies to all of the following, for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2026:(1) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a United States Department of Defense installation and who are certified by the United States Department of Defense as meeting its standards for firefighters.(2) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a National Aeronautics and Space Administration installation and who adhere to training standards established in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 13155) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) Active firefighting members of a fire department that provides fire protection to a commercial airport regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) under Part 139 (commencing with Section 139.1) of Subchapter G of Chapter I of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations and are trained in accordance with the standards of Section 139.319 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations.SEC. 11.SEC. 12. Section 832 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:832. (a) The administrator shall at least annually calculate, as of the close of and for the immediately preceding fiscal year, the experiences of school employers relative to usage of the Unemployment Fund. The calculations shall include tabulations on the experience of each school employer in relation to the expenditures from and the income to the School Employees Fund from the wages paid by the employer. All school employers shall be listed and ranked by ratio of use. The administrator shall also develop experience relationships on all benefits paid to employees through the School Employees Fund and on school employers’ experience related to use and exposure. Data shall relate to numbers of employees and types of programs and shall be calculated as of the close of and for the immediately preceding fiscal year. The report shall contain comments and recommendations on improvements to the administration, enforcement, and financing of the provisions relative to this article. The report by the administrator on the above shall be made each year to the Legislature and to the affected school employer, and governing board thereof, before March 31.(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 12.SEC. 13. Section 4902 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:4902. (a) The report, required by Section 4901, shall be transmitted to the Legislative Analyst, the Assembly Committees on Insurance, Labor and Employment, and Budget, the Senate Committees on Industrial Relations and Budget and Fiscal Review, the Department of Finance, and the Governor, on or before February 1 of each even-numbered year. The report shall do all of the following:(1) Provide a strategic information technology plan that describes the long-term goals and strategies that shall be undertaken by the department to create an information technology environment that will not only support the achievement of the department’s strategic business mission and goals but set the foundation for using information technology to make substantial and sustainable improvements in how it conducts business. The plan shall cover a three-year planning horizon and include the department’s information vision, its information management principles, and long-term goals and strategies for achieving its information vision.(2) Provide a tactical information plan of specific automation and infrastructure projects to be undertaken within three years of the date of the report. The plan shall include project description and scope, consistency with the strategic information plan, relationship to other projects, priority of development, estimated project costs and benefits, and improvements in services. For automation projects, it shall also provide reductions in personnel and operating costs, and identification of how personnel and cost savings will be used, transferred, or otherwise accounted for.(3) Not necessarily be in addition to or replace any reports now submitted by the director to the California Department of Technology.(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.